Hawaii statutes.
[§606-13.5] Definitions. As used in
this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

"Certified shorthand reporter" means
a shorthand reporter certified by the Hawaii supreme court through the Hawaii
board of certified shorthand reporters.

"Official court reporter" means a
certified shorthand reporter employed by the courts of the State to provide
court reporting services.

"Private court reporter" means a
certified shorthand reporter who offers services on a freelance basis and who
is not employed by the courts of the State. [L 1996, c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next